ukrainian.sbl
stringescapes {}

/* the 33 Ukrainian letters and apostrophe represented by single quote*/

stringdef a    '{U+0430}'
stringdef b    '{U+0431}'
stringdef v    '{U+0432}'
stringdef gh   '{U+0433}'
stringdef g    '{U+0491}'
stringdef d    '{U+0434}'
stringdef e    '{U+0435}'
stringdef ye   '{U+0454}'
stringdef zh   '{U+0436}'
stringdef z    '{U+0437}'
stringdef y    '{U+0438}'
stringdef i    '{U+0456}'
stringdef yi   '{U+0457}'
stringdef i`   '{U+0439}'
stringdef k    '{U+043A}'
stringdef l    '{U+043B}'
stringdef m    '{U+043C}'
stringdef n    '{U+043D}'
stringdef o    '{U+043E}'
stringdef p    '{U+043F}'
stringdef r    '{U+0440}'
stringdef s    '{U+0441}'
stringdef t    '{U+0442}'
stringdef u    '{U+0443}'
stringdef f    '{U+0444}'
stringdef kh   '{U+0445}'
stringdef ts   '{U+0446}'
stringdef ch   '{U+0447}'
stringdef sh   '{U+0448}'
stringdef shch '{U+0449}'
stringdef soft '{U+044C}'
stringdef iu   '{U+044E}'
stringdef ia   '{U+044F}'
stringdef apostrophe '{U+027}'

routines ( exception1
           adjective
           postfix
           verb
           noun
           tidy_up
)

externals ( stem )

define exception1 as (

    [substring] atlimit among(

		'{z}{d}{o}{r}{o}{v}{apostrophe}{ia}'      (<-'{z}{d}{o}{r}')
        /* invariant forms: */
		'{k}{r}{i}{m}'
		'{a}{d}{zh}{e}'
		'{a}{t}{o}{m}'
		'{k}{r}{o}{k}'
		'{d}{e}{s}{soft}'
		'{v}{i}{s}{soft}'
        // ... extensions possible here ...
    )
)


backwardmode (


    define adjective as (

        [substring] among (

			'{o}{v}{e}' '{o}{v}{a}' '{o}{v}{o}' '{o}{v}{y}{i`}'
			'{o}{v}{y}{m}' '{o}{v}{y}{kh}' '{o}{v}{o}{gh}{o}'
			'{o}{v}{o}{m}{u}' '{o}{v}{o}{iu}' '{o}{v}{o}{yi}'
			'{o}{v}{i}{i`}' '{y}{m}{y}'
            '{e}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{y}{i`}' '{o}{yi}' '{e}{m}' '{i}{m}'
            '{y}{m}' '{o}{m}' '{o}{gh}{o}' '{e}{m}{u}'
            '{o}{m}{u}' '{i}{kh}' '{y}{kh}' '{u}{iu}' '{iu}{iu}' '{a}{ia}'
            '{o}{iu}' '{e}{iu}'
                (delete)
        )
    )


    define postfix as (
        [substring] among (
            '{s}{ia}'
            '{s}{soft}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define verb as (
        [substring] among (
			'{sh}{o}{v}' '{sh}{l}{a}' '{sh}{l}{y}' '{sh}{l}{o}' (<-'{t}')
			'{u}{iu}{t}{soft}' '{a}{iu}{t}{soft}' '{i}{iu}{t}{soft}' '{y}{v}{sh}{y}'
			'{a}{n}{y}{m}{y}' '{a}{n}{y}{kh}' '{a}{n}{i}' '{y}{v}'
            '{i}{l}{a}' '{y}{l}{a}' '{y}{l}{y}' '{y}{t}{a}' '{e}{n}{a}'
            '{u}{i`}{t}{e}' '{u}{v}{a}{l}{y}' '{u}{v}{a}{l}{o}'
			'{u}{v}{a}{l}{a}' '{u}{v}{a}{v}' '{u}{v}{a}{t}{y}' '{u}{v}{a}{n}{n}{ia}'
			'{a}{l}{y}' '{a}{l}{o}' '{a}{l}{a}' '{a}{v}' '{y}{l}{i}'
            '{u}{i`}' '{a}{ye}' '{u}{ye}' '{i}{ye}' '{y}{ye}' '{ia}{ye}'
            '{i}{l}{o}' '{y}{l}{o}' '{e}{n}{o}' '{iu}{ye}'
            '{i}{t}{soft}' '{y}{t}{soft}'

                (delete)
        )
    )

    define noun as (
        [substring] among (
			'{ia}{t}{a}' '{ia}{t}{a}{m}' '{ia}{t}{a}{m}{y}'
			('{n}' delete)
			'{o}{k}'      (<-'{k}')
			'{o}{yi}{v}' '{o}{ia}{kh}' '{o}{ye}{m}' '{o}{ia}'
			'{i}{ia}{kh}'
            '{a}' '{yi}{v}' '{o}{v}{i}' '{o}{v}' '{i}{v}' '{e}'
			'{ia}{t}' '{i}{l}' '{y}{l}' '{e}{n}' '{u}{iu}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}{y}' '{ia}{m}{y}' '{a}{m}{y}'
			'{i}{yi}' '{i}{ye}{iu}'
            '{i}' '{e}{i`}' '{e}{yi}' '{o}{i`}' '{i}{i`}' '{i`}'
            '{i}{ia}{m}' '{ia}{m}' '{e}{m}' '{a}{m}' '{o}{m}'
            '{o}' '{u}' '{a}{kh}' '{ia}{kh}' '{y}' '{soft}'
            '{i}{iu}' '{iu}' '{i}{ia}' '{ia}'
                (delete)
        )
    )


    define tidy_up as (
        [substring] among (
            '{n}'
               ('{n}' delete)
			'{t}'
               ('{t}' delete)			   //double suffixes
            '{soft}'
			'{i}{ch}{n}'
			'{i}{i`}{s}{soft}{k}'
			'{s}{soft}{k}'
			'{soft}{n}'
			'{e}{n}' '{a}{n}' '{y}{t}' '{iu}{iu}{t}'
			'{u}{ye}{t}' '{a}{ye}{t}' '{iu}{ye}{t}' '{ia}{ye}{t}'
			'{apostrophe}'
               (delete)
			    '{o}{s}{t}'      (<-'{i}{s}{t}')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
	not hop 4 or (
	exception1 or
    backwards(
        do (
              try postfix
              adjective or verb or noun
        )
        do tidy_up
		)
	)
)
